District of Columbia statutes.
44-1705

Solicitor information cards.

(a)

No individual shall solicit in the District of Columbia unless he exhibits a solicitor information card or a copy thereof, produced and authenticated as provided in regulations made pursuant to this chapter, and reads it to the person solicited, or presents it to said person for his perusal, allowing him sufficient opportunity to read such card before accepting any contribution so solicited.

(b)

No individual shall solicit in the District of Columbia by printed matter or published article, or over the radio, television, telephone, or telegraph, unless such publicity shall contain the data and information required to be set forth on the solicitor information card; provided, that when any solicitation is made by telephone, the solicitor shall present to each person who consents or indicates a willingness to contribute, prior to accepting a contribution from said person, such solicitor information card or a copy thereof produced and authenticated as provided in regulations made pursuant to this chapter.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 280, Pub. L. 85-87, § 6

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-1703.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-705.
1973 Ed., § 2-2105.